Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-901
Indigenous Peoples' Day and Columbus Day.

The second Monday in October of each year shall be Indigenous Peoples' Day and Columbus Day and shall be set apart to recognize the historic, cultural, and contemporary significance of the people indigenous to the lands that are now known as the Americas, including Nebraska, and the many contributions of such people.

Laws 2020, LB848, § 1.